Idaho, session 2025, H0444.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Lands the following
amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and expense
classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026:
FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. BUSINESS SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $4,000 $106,400 $110,400
Department of Lands
Fund 21,500 231,400 252,900
Endowment Earnings Administrative
Fund 76,500 1,013,300 1,089,800
TOTAL $102,000 $1,351,100 $1,453,100
II. FOREST RESOURCES MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
Department of Lands
Fund $156,400 $156,400


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
III. TRUST LAND MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
Endowment Earnings Administrative
Fund $776,900 $776,900
IV. FOREST AND RANGE FIRE PROTECTION:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,364,500 $450,000 $69,500 $66,800 $1,950,800
Department of Lands
Fund 223,300 371,000 1,711,000 83,500 2,388,800
TOTAL $1,587,800 $821,000 $1,780,500 $150,300 $4,339,600
V. MINERALS, PUBLIC TRUST, OIL AND GAS:
FROM:
Oil and Gas Conservation
Fund $28,900 $28,900
Navigable Waterways
Fund 83,500 $337,300 $80,000 500,800
TOTAL $112,400 $337,300 $80,000 $529,700
GRANDTOTAL $1,700,200 $1,260,300 $4,144,900 $150,300 $7,255,700
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Department of Lands is hereby reduced by the
following amounts according to the designated programs and expense classes
from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:


FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING
COSTS EXPENDITURES TOTAL
I. TRUST LAND MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
Navigable Waterways
Fund $6,000 $6,000
EndowmentEarningsAdministrative
Fund 35,600 35,600
TOTAL $41,600 $41,600
II. MINERALS, PUBLIC TRUST, OIL AND GAS:
FROM:
Department of Lands
Fund $70,800 $337,300 $408,100
GRAND TOTAL $112,400 $337,300 $449,700
SECTION 3. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the Department of Lands is hereby increased by three (3.00) for the period
July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 4. CASH TRANSFER. There is hereby appropriated and the Office
of the State Controller shall transfer $40,000,000 from the General Fund to
the Fire Suppression Deficiency Warrant Fund as soon as practicable for the
period July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025. Such moneys shall be used to re-
imburse costs incurred by the Forest and Range Fire Protection Program in the
Department of Lands pursuant to Sections 38-131 and 38-131A, Idaho Code.
SECTION 5. ABANDONED MINE RECLAMATION FUND. At least ninety percent of
all reclamation funds expended annually shall be spent on expenses directly
incurred for eligible mine site engineering and on-site restoration plan
implementation and on compensation for services paid pursuant to section
47-1709, Idaho Code.
SECTION 6. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 7. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Section 4 of this act shall be in full force and effect on
and after passage and approval, and Sections 1, 2, 3, 5, and 6 of this act
shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2025.